West Virginia, session 2026, HB4316.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Board of Physical Therapy. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-20A-2 of this code, modified by the Board of Physical Therapy to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 21, 2025, relating to the Board of Physical Therapy (general provisions for athletic trainers, 16 CSR 05), is authorized.